Utah statutes.
62A-4a-606.   Child placing agency responsibility for educational services -- Payment of costs.

(1)  A child placing agency shall ensure that the requirements of Subsections 53A-11-101.5(2) and 53A-11-101.7(1) are met through the provision of appropriate educational services for all children served in the state by the agency.

(2)  If the educational services are to be provided through a public school, and:

(a)  the custodial parent or legal guardian resides outside the state, then the child placing agency shall pay all educational costs required under Sections 53A-2-205 and 53A-12-102; or

(b)  the custodial parent or legal guardian resides within the state, then the child placing agency shall pay all educational costs required under Section 53A-12-102.

(3)  Children in the custody or under the care of a Utah state agency are exempt from the payment of fees required under Subsection (2).

(4)  A public school shall admit any child living within its school boundaries who is under the supervision of a child placing agency upon payment by the agency of the tuition and fees required under Subsection (2).



Amended by Chapter 81, 2007 General Session

